Oklahoma, session 2025, SB333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 63 O.S. 2021, Section 1054, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1054. The following terms, wherever used or referred to
in this act the Oklahoma Housing Authorities Act, shall have the
following respective meanings, unless a different meaning clearly
appears from the context:
(a) 1. “Authority” means any public body corporate and politic
created by this act. the Oklahoma Housing Authorities Act;
(b) 2. “City” means any incorporated city or town in the
state.;
3. “County” means any county in the state.;
(c) 4. “Governing body” means, in the case of a city, the
council or other governing body of the city in which is vested
legislative authority customarily imposed on the city council, and,
in the case of a county, the board of county commissioners.;

(d) 5. “Mayor” means the mayor of the city or the officer
thereof charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor or
executive head of a city.;
(e) 6. “Clerk” means the city clerk or the county clerk, as the
case may be.;
(f) 7. “Area of operation” means:
(1) a. in the case of an authority of a city, the city and
the area within one (1) mile of the territorial
boundaries thereof, except that the area of operation
of an authority of any city shall not include any area
which lies within the territorial boundaries of some
other city;,
(2) b. in the case of an authority of a county, all of the
county for which it is created:. Provided, that a
county authority shall not undertake any project
within the boundaries of any city unless a resolution
shall have been adopted by the governing body of the
city and by any authority which shall have been
theretofore established and authorized to exercise its
powers in the city declaring that there is need for
the county authority to exercise its powers within
that city. No authority shall operate in any area in
which an authority already established is operating
without the consent by resolution of the authority
already operating therein., and
c. in the case of an authority of a city or of a county
and only for the purpose of construction or
rehabilitation projects, beginning on the effective
date of this act, anywhere within this state;
provided, such city or county housing authority has
consulted with the city, county or counties, and all
other active and duly certified city and county
housing authorities, if any, where the project or
projects are located;
ENR. S. B. NO. 333 Page 2

(g) 8. “Federal government” includes means the United States of
America, the Public Housing Administration United States Department
of Housing and Urban Development, or any other agency or
instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of
America.;
(h) 9. “Slum” means any area where dwellings predominate which
by reason of dilapidation,; overcrowding,; faulty arrangement or
design,; lack of ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities,; or any
combination of these factors, are detrimental to safety, health, and
morals.;
(i) 10. “Housing project” or “project” means any work or
undertaking on contiguous or noncontiguous sites:
(1) a. to demolish, clear, or remove buildings from any
slum area;,
(2) b. to provide or assist in providing (by any suitable
method, including, but not limited to: rental; sale
of individual units in single or multifamily
structures under a conventional, condominium, or
cooperative sales contract; lease-purchase agreement;
loans; or subsidizing of rentals or charges for
housing projects located within the territorial
boundaries of the authority of a city or county but
excluding the expanded area of operation as defined in
subparagraph c of paragraph 7 of this section) decent,
safe, and sanitary urban or rural dwellings,
apartments, or other living accommodations for persons
of low income;, or
(3) c. to accomplish a combination of the foregoing
subparagraphs a and b of this paragraph. Such work or
undertaking may include buildings, land, equipment,
facilities, and other real or personal property for
necessary, convenient, or desirable appurtenances;
streets, sewers, water service, utilities, parks, site
preparation, and landscaping; and facilities for
administrative, community, health, recreational,
welfare, or other purposes. The term “housing
project” housing project or “project” project also may
ENR. S. B. NO. 333 Page 3

be applied to the planning of the buildings and
improvements, the acquisition of property or any
interest therein, the demolition of existing
structures, the construction, reconstruction,
rehabilitation, alteration, or repair of the
improvements and all other work in connection
therewith; and the term shall include all other real
and personal property and all tangible or intangible
assets held or used in connection with the housing
project.;
(j) 11. “Persons of low income” shall mean means persons or
families who lack the amount of income which is necessary (as
determined by the authority undertaking the housing project) to
enable them, without financial assistance, to live in decent, safe,
and sanitary dwellings, without overcrowding,; however, the local
housing authority shall not exceed the guidelines in establishing
incomes set forth by the United States Department of Housing and
Urban Development.;
(k) 12. “Bonds” means any bonds, notes, interim certificates,
debentures, or other obligations issued by an authority pursuant to
this act. the Oklahoma Housing Authorities Act;
(l) 13. “Real property” includes means all lands, including
improvements and fixtures thereon, and property of any nature
appurtenant thereto, or used in connection therewith, and every
estate, interest, and right, legal or equitable, therein including
terms for years.;
(m) 14. “Obligee of an authority” or “obligee” includes means
any bondholder, agent or trustee for any bondholder, or lessor
demising to the authority property used in connection with a
project, or any assignee or assignees of such lessor’s interest or
any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to
any contract with the authority.;
(n) 15. “Persons engaged in national defense activities” means
persons in the Armed Forces of the United States;, employees of the
Department of Defense;, and workers engaged or to be engaged in
activities connected with national defense. The term also includes
ENR. S. B. NO. 333 Page 4

the families of the persons, employees, and workers who reside with
them.;
(o) 16. “Major disaster” means any flood, drought, fire,
hurricane, tornado, earthquake, storm, or other catastrophe which,
in the determination of the governing body, is of sufficient
severity and magnitude to warrant the use of available resources of
the federal, state, and local governments to alleviate the damage,
hardship, or suffering caused thereby.; and
(p) 17. “State public body” means any city, county, municipal
corporation, commission, district, authority, agency, subdivision,
or public body of the state.
ENR. S. B. NO. 333 Page 5

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 333 Page 6